Washington statutes.
RCW 21.30.150

No liability under chapter for act in good faith.

No provision of this chapter imposing any liability applies to any act done or omitted in good faith in conformity with a rule, order, or form adopted by the director, notwithstanding that the rule, order, or form may later be amended, or rescinded, or be determined by judicial or other authority to be invalid for any reason.

[ 1986 c 14 s 15.]